Hawaii, session 2026, HB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  Small Housing Provider Grant Program §201H-A  Definitions.  For purposes of this subpart: "Eligible property owner" means an owner of a multi-family building who has an income at or below one hundred fifty per cent of the median family income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. "Multi-family building" means a residential building that has no less than two rental units but no more than fifty rental units. §201H-B  Small housing provider grant program; established.  (a)  There is established within the corporation the small housing provider grant program to provide grants to eligible property owners of multi-family buildings. (b)  An eligible property owner may apply for a grant under the small housing provider grant program in a form prescribed by the corporation.  Upon determination by the corporation that an eligible property owner qualifies for the grant program, the eligible property owner shall sign a grant agreement and agree to a five-year affordability covenant to be placed on the rental property pursuant to section 201H-D. (c)  An eligible property owner may receive no more than $           per rental unit in a multi-family building; provided that the maximum amount an eligible property owner may receive for projects in one multi-family building shall not exceed $          . §201H-C  Authorized uses.  Grants provided under this subpart shall be used: (1)  For property renovations and repairs, including structural repairs, plumbing, electrical, and safety repairs; and (2)  To address hazardous and unsafe living conditions. §201H-D  Affordability covenant; violations.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an affordability covenant placed on a rental unit shall require that the rental unit be subject to maximum allowable rent limits and maximum income eligibility limits, as determined by the corporation, for a period of five years. (b)  During the five years the affordability covenant is in place, the eligible property owner shall submit tenant income certifications on an annual basis to the corporation.  The corporation may conduct property inspections to ensure compliance with this section and section 201H-C. (c)  The corporation shall be entitled to repayment of the full amount of grants provided under this subpart if it finds an eligible property owner violated this section. §201H-E  Rules. The corporation shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate this subpart, including additional eligibility requirements for the grant program, if deemed necessary by the corporation." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the small housing provider grant program established pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________